Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-183
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Weights and Measures Act:

(1) Actual cost means all the costs associated with the enforcement of the act, including overhead, administration, personnel, and equipment expenses;

(2) Certificate of Conformance means a National Type Evaluation Program Certificate of Conformance issued by (a) the National Institute of Standards and Technology or (b) the National Conference on Weights and Measures establishing that the commercial weighing and measuring device, based on testing, meets the requirements of National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44;

(3) Commercial weighing and measuring device means any weights and measures or weighing and measuring device used or employed in commerce in (a) establishing the size, quantity, extent, area, or measurement of any commodity sold, offered, or submitted for hire, (b) computing any basic charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of weight, measure, or count, or (c) establishing eligibility for any award. A commercial weighing and measuring device also includes any accessory attached to or used in connection with a commercial weighing or measuring device when such accessory is so designed or installed that its operation affects or may affect the accuracy of the device;

(4) Commodity means any service or item or any combination of items forming a distinctive product sold in commerce which is affected by any determination of weight, measure, or count;

(5) Correct, when used in connection with commercial weighing and measuring devices, means conformance to all applicable requirements of the act;

(6) Department means the Department of Agriculture or its authorized agent;

(7) Director means the Director of Agriculture or his or her designated employee, representative, or authorized agent;

(8) Kept for sale, in any of its variant forms, means the possession of commodities by a business which sells such commodities;

(9) Modification or modified, when used in connection with commercial weighing and measuring devices, means any change which does not alter the original metrological design characteristics as specified by the device manufacturer or National Type Evaluation Program technical policies;

(10) Net drained weight means the weight of a commodity excluding any materials, substances, or items not considered to be part of the commodity. Materials, substances, or items not considered to be part of the commodity include free liquid, containers, conveyances, bags, wrappers, packaging materials, labels, individual piece coverings, decorative accompaniments, prizes, and coupons;

(11) Net weight means the weight of a commodity excluding any materials, substances, or items not considered to be part of the commodity. Materials, substances, or items not considered to be part of the commodity include containers, conveyances, bags, wrappers, packaging materials, labels, individual piece coverings, decorative accompaniments, prizes, and coupons;

(12) Package means any commodity put up or packaged in any container in advance of sale in units suitable for sale;

(13) Person means any individual, partnership, limited liability company, association, corporation, or organized group of persons, whether incorporated or not;

(14) Primary standards means the physical standards of the state which serve as the legal reference from which all other standards are derived;

(15) Sale, in any of its variant forms, means sale, to barter, exchange, offer for sale, or expose for sale, in any of their variant forms, or otherwise supply;

(16) Sale from bulk means sale, in any of its variant forms, of commodities when the quantity is determined at the time of sale;

(17) Secondary standards means the physical standards which are traceable to the primary standards through comparisons using acceptable laboratory procedures. Such standards shall be used in the sale of a commodity or in the verification of weights and measures or weighing and measuring devices for accuracy;

(18) Tare weight means the weight of containers, conveyances, bags, wrappers, packaging materials, labels, individual piece coverings, decorative accompaniments, prizes, coupons, or items not considered to be part of the commodity deducted from the gross weight to determine the weight of the commodity;

(19) Weighing and measuring device means all instruments and devices of every kind used to determine the quantity of any commodity and includes weights and measures and any appliances and accessories associated with any such instruments and devices except meters, appliances, and accessories which are exempted from the requirements of the act pursuant to subdivision (5) of section 89-187;

(20) Weighing and measuring establishment means a location with one or more commercial weighing and measuring devices or any operation which employs commercial weighing and measuring devices which are mobile; and

(21) Weight, when used in connection with any commodity, means net weight, except when a commodity is sold by drained weight, the term means net drained weight.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 473, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 161, § 1.